District of Columbia statutes.
20-331

Finality of abbreviated and standard probate proceedings.

(a)

An abbreviated probate proceeding shall be set aside if, within 6 months after notice of the appointment of the personal representative pursuant to section 20-704, an interested person makes a request for a standard probate proceeding.

(b)

A standard probate proceeding may be reopened if, within 6 months after the notice of appointment of the personal representative pursuant to section 20-704: (1) An interested person makes a request; and (2) the Court finds that:

(A)

the notice provided in section 20-704 was not given to such interested person and such interested person did not have actual notice of the petition for probate;

(B)

there was a material mistake or substantial irregularity in the prior probate proceeding; or

(C)

the proponent of a later offered will, in spite of the exercise of reasonable diligence, was actually unaware of such will’s existence at the time of the prior probate proceeding.

(c)

Except as provided in section 20-305 and this section, an abbreviated probate proceeding shall be final and binding as to all interested persons.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(p), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-311 and § 20-322.
1981 Ed., § 20-331.
Application of 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.